Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1856.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of May 1, 1933 (P.L.103, No.69), known as The Second Class Township Code, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 2302.1. Mowing Operations.--(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law or a policy adopted by the Department of Transportation, a township shall not be required to utilize a shadow vehicle in support of mowing operations along township roads conducted by township employes or by contract.(b) Nothing in this section shall prohibit a township from voluntarily utilizing a shadow vehicle if deemed necessary by the board of supervisors.(c) As used in this section, the term "shadow vehicle" means 12345678910111213141516171819 a vehicle used to follow mobile mowing and maintenance activities within a township.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1856PN2294 - 2 - 123